Washington statutes.
RCW 6.26.030

Action on bond for wrongful garnishment—Damages and attorney's fees.

In an action on the bond under RCW 6.26.020, if it is shown that the garnishment was wrongfully sued out, the defendant may recover the actual damages sustained and reasonable attorney's fees to be fixed by the court. If it is shown that such garnishment was sued out maliciously, the defendant may also recover exemplary damages, and the defendant need not wait until the principal suit is determined before suing on the bond by counterclaim in the original action or in a separate action.

[ 1987 c 442 s 903.]